Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.270

Annual report of citations—Publication—Contents.

The department shall annually publish a report listing all licensees by name and address, indicating (1) the number of citations and the nature of each citation issued to each licensee during the previous twelve-month period and the status of any action taken pursuant to each citation, including penalties assessed, and (2) the nature and status of action taken with respect to each uncorrected violation for which a citation is outstanding.

The report shall be available to the public, at cost, at all offices of the department.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 14.]